Washington statutes.
RCW 36.43.040

Penalty for violation of code or regulation.

Any person violating the provisions of any building code or any fire regulation lawfully adopted by any board of county commissioners shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.43.040. Prior: 1943 c 204 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4077-13.]